Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
ARTICLE 9
MOTOR VEHICLE REPAIR ACT

Law reviews:

For article, "Analysis of the 1995 Amendment to the Motor Vehicle Repair Act of 1977", see 25

Colo. Law. 43

(Dec. 1996).

Section

42-9-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Motor Vehicle Repair Act of 1977".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2500, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-101 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Auto parts recycler" means any person who purchases motor vehicles for the purpose of dismantling and selling the components thereof and who complies with all federal, state, and local regulations. "Auto parts recycler" includes a vehicle dismantler.

(1.2) "Customer" means the owner, the agent of the owner, or a family member, employee, or any other person whose use of the vehicle is authorized by the owner.

(1.5) "Estimate" means a written or oral assessment that describes structural damage to or mechanical needs of a motor vehicle. The estimate shall include total estimated costs of repair, excluding sales taxes and towing charges, together with a statement as to whether any parts to be installed are new original equipment manufacturer, new nonoriginal equipment manufacturer, used, reconditioned, or rebuilt.

(1.6) "Inflatable restraint system" has the same meaning as is set forth in 49 CFR sec. 507.208 S4.1.5.1 (b).

(1.7) "Invoice" means the final statement for services rendered.

"Motor vehicle" means every self-propelled vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on the public highways. The term does not include trucks and truck tractors having a gross vehicle weight of more than eight thousand five hundred pounds, nor does it include farm tractors and other machines and tools used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products, nor does it include motorcycles.

"Motor vehicle repair facility" means any natural person, partnership, corporation, trust, association, or group of persons associated in fact although not a legal entity which, with intent to make a profit or a gain of money or other thing of value, engages in the business or occupation of performing repairs on a motor vehicle, including repairs on body parts. The term "motor vehicle repair facility" includes a motor vehicle repair garage.

"Necessary" means essential to a desired or projected end as stated by the customer or indispensable to avoid loss or damage.

"Repairs on a motor vehicle" or "repairs" includes maintenance, diagnosis, repairs, service, and parts replacement but does not include washing the vehicle or adding gasoline or oil to the vehicle.

"Work order" means a document that a customer signs to authorize repairs. "Work order" may include an estimate.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2500, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(3) amended and (1.5), (1.7), and (6) added, p. 857, § 1, effective May 21; (1) amended and (1.2) and (1.6) added, p. 796, § 2, effective August 6.

42-9-103. Applicability.

The provisions of sections 42-9-104, 42-9-105, and 42-9-106 shall not apply where the total cost of the labor and parts is one hundred dollars or less.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2501, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-102.5 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-104. When consent and estimate required - original transaction - disassembly.

No repairs on a motor vehicle shall be performed by a motor vehicle repair facility unless the facility obtains the written consent of the customer.

The required written consent is waived by the customer only when the motor vehicle has been towed to the motor vehicle repair facility or the customer has left the motor vehicle with the motor vehicle repair facility outside of normal business hours or when the customer has signed a waiver in compliance with paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section. The waiver established by this paragraph (b) for any vehicle that is towed to a motor vehicle repair facility or left with the motor vehicle repair facility outside of normal business hours is limited to a maximum of one hundred dollars for all labor and parts.

When the customer has not given the motor vehicle repair facility written consent to perform repairs, no repairs shall be performed unless the facility first communicates orally to the customer the written estimate of the total cost of such repairs and the customer then consents to the required repairs. A record of such communication and consent shall be made on the work order by the motor vehicle repair facility and shall include the date, time, manner of consent, telephone number called, if any, and the names of the persons giving and receiving such consent. If more than one such communication occurs between the motor vehicle repair facility and the customer, a record of the telephone number need not be made for each subsequent communication if the telephone number is the same as on the initial consent.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), no repairs shall be performed by a motor vehicle repair facility unless said facility first submits in writing or, where allowed by this section, orally communicates to the customer an estimate of the total cost of any such repairs. The written estimate shall include the expected completion date of such repairs. A copy of the completed written estimate of the total cost of repair shall be provided to the customer.
(2) (a) (I) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), no repairs shall be performed by a motor vehicle repair facility unless said facility first submits in writing or, where allowed by this section, orally communicates to the customer an estimate of the total cost of any such repairs. The written estimate shall include the expected completion date of such repairs. A copy of the completed written estimate of the total cost of repair shall be provided to the customer.

Except as provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (II), storage charges may accrue, beginning on the fourth day, if the customer has not picked up the motor vehicle within three days, exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, any legal holiday, and any days the repair facility is closed for business, after notification of the completion of authorized repairs or if the customer failed to authorize repairs to be performed within three days, exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, any legal holiday, and any days the repair facility is closed for business, after the date of communication of an estimate.

Storage charges shall be assessed in accordance with section 38-20-109, C.R.S., if the facility chooses to sell the customer's property in accordance with article 20 of title 38, C.R.S.

The amounts that a customer may be charged for storage charges shall be conspicuously printed on the separate written authorization provided to the customer.

The work order provided to the customer shall state conspicuously that, except for body shop repair parts and exchanged or warranty parts that shall only be presented to the customer for examination and not returned, and except for inflatable restraint system components, the customer is entitled to the return of the replaced parts if the customer so requests at the time of consenting to or authorizing the repairs.

The work order, or a legible copy thereof, shall be retained by the motor vehicle repair facility for at least three years.

A customer may waive the right to receive any estimate, either written or oral, prior to authorizing repairs by signing the customer's name and the date below the following statement that shall be in bold type: "I DO NOT WISH TO RECEIVE ANY ESTIMATE, EITHER WRITTEN OR ORAL, TO WHICH I AM ENTITLED BY LAW, BEFORE REPAIRS ARE AUTHORIZED." The signing of such waiver does not constitute an authorization of repairs, which shall be a separate statement.

In the event that it is necessary to disassemble, or partially disassemble, a motor vehicle or a motor vehicle part in order to provide the customer with an estimate for required repairs, the written estimate required in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall show the cost of reassembly in the event that the customer elects not to proceed with the repairs of the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part. The estimate shall also include the total cost of labor and parts to replace those expendable items that are normally destroyed by such disassembly. No act of disassembly that would prevent the restoration of the same unit to its former condition may be undertaken unless the motor vehicle repair facility has fully informed the customer of that fact in writing on the work order and the customer consents to the disassembly.

Any estimate of required repairs given after a disassembly shall comply with the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2); except that such written estimate may then be communicated orally to the customer. A record of such communication shall be made on the work order by the motor vehicle repair facility, including the date, time, manner of communication, telephone number called, if any, and names of persons giving and receiving such consent. If more than one such communication occurs between the motor vehicle repair facility and the customer, a record of the telephone number need not be made for each subsequent communication if the telephone number is the same as on the initial consent.

Towing charges are excluded from the written or oral estimate and consent requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2501, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(b) and (2)(a) amended, p. 575, § 1, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 2, effective May 21; (2)(a)(III) amended, p. 797, § 3, effective August 6.

42-9-105. When consent and estimate required - additional repairs - changed completion date.

Except when an estimate has been waived pursuant to section 42-9-104 (2)(b), no charge shall be made for labor and parts in excess of the estimate, plus ten percent thereof or twenty-five dollars, whichever is less, without the consent of the customer to the additional charge before performance of the labor or installation of the parts not included in the estimate. Consent by the customer to additional charges may be written or oral. In either case, a record of such consent shall be made on the work order by the motor vehicle repair facility and shall include the date, time, manner of consent, telephone number called, if any, and names of the persons giving and receiving the consent. If more than one such communication occurs between the motor vehicle repair facility and the customer, a record of the telephone number need not be made for each subsequent communication if the telephone number is the same as on the initial consent.

The customer shall be notified in writing on the work order of any changes in the expected completion date of the repairs and of the new expected completion date. Such notification may be communicated to the customer orally, but such communication, written or oral, shall be made no more than twenty-four hours after the original completion date, exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, and any legal holiday. If communicated orally, a record of such communication shall be made on the work order by the motor vehicle repair facility and shall include the date, time, telephone number called, if any, and names of the persons giving and receiving such communication. If the name of the person receiving such communication is different than the original customer, the name and telephone number called, if any, shall be recorded on the work order.

No additional changes in the completion date shall be made unless the consent of the customer to the additional change is obtained. If the required consent is given orally, the motor vehicle repair facility shall make a record of such consent on the work order and shall include the date, time, manner of consent, and the names of the persons giving and receiving such consent.

If the motor vehicle repair facility fails to notify the customer of the change in the completion date or if the customer refuses to consent to an additional change in the completion date, the contract may be cancelled at the option of either the customer or the motor vehicle repair facility. Once the contract has been cancelled in this manner, the motor vehicle repair facility shall be required to reassemble the motor vehicle in substantially the same condition in which it was delivered to the motor vehicle repair facility without cost to the customer unless the customer has been previously notified as to the impracticality of such reassembly; except that the customer shall be required to pay for any repairs already completed as specified in section 42-9-106 (3)(a).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2502, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2)(a) and (2)(c) amended, p. 576, § 2, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 860, § 3, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-103.1 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-106. Amounts over estimate - storage charges - cancellation of authorized repairs.

Except when an estimate has been waived pursuant to section 42-9-104 (2)(b), if the charge for labor and parts is over the original estimate or any subsequent estimate by ten percent thereof or twenty-five dollars, whichever is less, and unless further oral or written consent is given by the customer pursuant to section 42-9-105 (1), the motor vehicle repair facility shall return the motor vehicle to the customer upon the payment of the amount of the original estimate or any subsequent estimate plus ten percent thereof or twenty-five dollars, whichever is less, and the motor vehicle repair facility shall not be entitled to a lien for said excess pursuant to section 38-20-106, C.R.S.

No charge shall be made for storage of the motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is not picked up by the customer within three days, exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, legal holidays, and any days the repair facility is closed for business, after the customer is notified that the repairs have been completed and the customer was notified, as required by section 42-9-104 (2)(a), that such storage charges would accrue. Storage charges may accrue pursuant to a written agreement, separate from any other repair document, between the motor vehicle repair facility and the customer. The written authorization, in bold type, shall state the following:

If the customer cancels previously authorized repairs prior to their completion, the motor vehicle repair facility shall be entitled to charge the customer for repairs, including labor and parts, which have already been performed so long as said charge does not exceed the original estimate or any subsequent estimate for the repairs already performed.

In requesting the return of the motor vehicle subsequent to the cancellation of previously authorized repairs, the customer shall specify whether it should be reassembled in substantially the same condition in which it was delivered to the motor vehicle repair facility or in such a lesser condition of assembly as the customer shall designate. Reassembly shall be completed by the motor vehicle repair facility within three days of the customer's request, excluding Saturday, Sunday, any legal holiday, and any days the repair facility is closed for business.

All charges for reassembly, whether or not the requested repairs are completed, shall be included in the original estimate or in any subsequent estimate.

Nothing in this section shall require a motor vehicle repair facility to give an estimate if such facility does not agree to perform the requested repairs.

Payment by the customer of any amount in excess of those allowed by this article or for unauthorized repairs is not a waiver of any of the rights granted by this article to the customer, nor shall such payment be construed as consent to additional repairs or excess charges.

All written estimates and other information required by this section shall be recorded on or attached to the invoice described in section 42-9-108.

Storage Fee Policy

A storage fee may not be charged unless a written agreement, separate from any other repair document, for an amount is reached. A storage fee may be charged, beginning on the fourth day, if a motor vehicle is not removed within three days after the customer is notified that repairs have been completed, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and any days the repair facility is closed for business.
The motor vehicle repair facility shall make a record of the notice of completion on the work order. The record shall include the date and time of the notice of completion, the manner of communication of the notice, the telephone number called, if any, and the name of the person receiving the notice.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2503, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 576, § 3, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 97:

(1), (2), (3)(a), (3)(b), and (4) amended, p. 861, § 4, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-103.5 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-107. Used, reconditioned, or rebuilt parts.

The motor vehicle repair facility shall specify in the original estimate whether any parts to be installed are new original equipment manufacturer, new nonoriginal equipment manufacturer, used, reconditioned, or rebuilt and then shall obtain the consent of the customer before any new original equipment manufacturer, new nonoriginal equipment manufacturer, used, reconditioned, or rebuilt parts are installed in the motor vehicle. If such consent is oral, the motor vehicle repair facility shall make a record of such consent on the work order and shall include the date, time, and manner of consent. The telephone number called, if any, and the name of the person giving and receiving the consent, if different than the original customer, shall be recorded on the work order. The motor vehicle repair facility shall adjust the original estimate for new parts to reflect the altered cost if used, reconditioned, or rebuilt parts are authorized and installed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2504, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 577, § 4, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 862, § 5, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-104 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-108. Invoice.

All repairs done by a motor vehicle repair facility shall be recorded on a customer's invoice. A legible copy of the customer's invoice shall be given to the customer when the motor vehicle is returned to the customer. The original or a legible copy of the customer's invoice shall be retained for at least three years by the motor vehicle repair facility.

The customer's invoice shall include the following:

The name and address of the customer;

The year, make, odometer reading on the date the motor vehicle was brought in for repairs, and license number of the motor vehicle;

The date the motor vehicle was received for repairs;

An itemization of each part added to or replaced in the motor vehicle; a description of each part by name and identifying number; clear identification of which parts are used, reconditioned, or rebuilt; and the charges levied for each part added or replaced;

The amount charged for labor, the full name or employee number of each mechanic or repairer who in whole or in part performed repairs, and the identification of the specific stage of repair for which each mechanic or repairer named was partially or wholly responsible;

An itemized statement of all additional charges, including storage, service and handling, and taxes;

An identification of any repairs subcontracted to another repair facility;

The legible initials of the person filling out any portion of the invoice not specified in this subsection (2); and

A copy of any warranty issued by the motor vehicle repair facility setting forth the terms and conditions of such warranty.

Itemization of a particular part is not required on the customer's invoice if no charge is levied for that part.

Miscellaneous designations such as "shop supplies", "paint and paint supplies", and "shop materials" may be used on the customer's invoice.

Designation of mechanics, repairers, parts, or labor is not required on the customer's invoice if the customer has been given a flat-rate price, if such repairs are customarily done and billed on a flat-rate price basis and agreed upon by the customer, and if such flat rates are conspicuously posted by the motor vehicle repair garage or otherwise made available to the customer prior to rendering the estimate.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2504, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(1), (2)(g), and (2)(h) amended and (2)(i) added, p. 862, § 6, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-105 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-108.5. Warranty completion date.

When a motor vehicle is returned under a warranty issued by the repair facility, the facility shall give the customer a written notice that specifies that the work is under warranty and that provides the customer with a completion date for the repair, as required by section 42-9-104.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 577, § 5, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 863, § 7, effective May 21.

42-9-108.7. Motor vehicle repair facility warranties.

If a motor vehicle repair facility issues a motor vehicle repair facility warranty, such warranty shall appear with the invoice and shall set forth all terms and conditions of such warranty. The facility warranty shall be limited to the terms and conditions set forth in such warranty.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 863, § 8, effective May 21.

42-9-109. Return of replaced parts.

Except for body shop repair parts, inflatable restraint system components, and parts that the motor vehicle repair facility is required to return to the manufacturer or distributor under a manufacturer warranty or exchange arrangement, the motor vehicle repair facility shall return replaced parts to the customer at the time of the completion of the repairs if the customer so requests at the time of consenting to or authorizing the repairs. A motor vehicle repair facility is not authorized to return any components of an inflatable restraint system to the consumer.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2505, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 863, § 9, effective May 21; entire section amended, p. 797, § 4, effective August 6.

42-9-109.5. Inflatable restraint systems - replacement.

A motor vehicle repair garage may replace an inflatable restraint system only with an inflatable restraint system that is newly manufactured or an inflatable restraint system salvaged and sold by a vehicle dismantler or auto parts recycler.

A motor vehicle repair garage is not required to install a salvaged inflatable restraint system and may do so only upon obtaining specific written authorization from the customer. A motor vehicle repair garage installing a salvaged inflatable restraint system shall include the phrase "salvaged inflatable restraint system" prominently on the face of the invoice. A motor vehicle repair garage may not use other terms, including but not limited to "used" or "as is", to describe a salvaged inflatable restraint system on an invoice.

If a vehicle dismantler or auto parts recycler sells a salvaged inflatable restraint system, the vehicle dismantler or auto parts recycler shall state the following information on the invoice:

The date of sale of the salvaged inflatable restraint system;

The vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which the inflatable restraint system was salvaged; and

The part number of the salvaged inflatable restraint system, if such number is available.

A vehicle dismantler or auto parts recycler shall maintain the bill of sale for any sale of a salvaged inflatable restraint system for at least three years after the date of the sale.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 797, § 5, effective August 6.

42-9-110. Exemption - antique motor vehicles.

This article does not apply to repairs of any motor vehicle twenty-five or more years old or of any motor vehicle that is a collector's item as defined in section 42-12-101.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2505, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 248, § 19, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-107 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-111. Prohibited acts.

No motor vehicle repair facility or any employee or contract laborer of such facility shall:

Charge for repairs which have not been consented to by the customer or charge for repairs in excess of amounts allowed by this article;

Represent that repairs are necessary when such is not a fact;

Represent that repairs have been performed when such is not a fact;

Represent that a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part being diagnosed is in dangerous condition when such is not a fact;

Perform emissions repairs to bring motor vehicles into compliance with the provisions of sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 when such repairs are not indicated by the identified emissions failure;

Fail to issue an invoice as required by section 42-9-108;

Fail to give notice as required by section 42-9-105;

Require a customer to sign a work order that does not state the repairs that are requested by the customer;

Fail to state the motor vehicle odometer reading, unless such reading is unfeasible due to the condition of the odometer; or

Install or reinstall, as part of a vehicle inflatable restraint system, any object in lieu of an air bag that was designed in accordance with federal safety regulations for the make, model, and year of the vehicle.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2506, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(f) to (1)(h) added, p. 577, § 6, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 97:

IP(1) and (1)(h) amended and (1)(i) added, p. 863, § 10, effective May 21.

L. 2002:

(1)(h) and (1)(i) amended and (1)(j) added, p. 196, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-108 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-112. Criminal penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any motor vehicle repair facility or any employee of such facility that fails to provide a completed written or oral estimate as required under section 42-9-104 (2), or an invoice as required under section 42-9-108, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than two thousand dollars per violation. No portion of the minimum fine for repeat offenders shall be suspended.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, any motor vehicle repair facility or any employee of such facility who violates section 42-9-111 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars per violation. No portion of the minimum fine for repeat offenders shall be suspended.

(2.5) Any motor vehicle repair facility or any employee of such facility who violates any provision of this article other than the provisions for which penalties are provided in subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of five hundred dollars per violation.

(2.7) A violation of this article shall also constitute a deceptive trade practice in violation of the "Colorado Consumer Protection Act", article 1 of title 6, C.R.S., and shall subject the motor vehicle repair facility or any employee of such facility to the remedies or penalties contained in article 1 of title 6.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 97, p. 863

, § 11, effective May 21, 1997.)

Any motor vehicle repair facility or any employee of such facility who violates the provisions of section 42-9-111 (1)(j) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars and not more than five thousand dollars per violation, or imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year, or both.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2506, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 578, § 7, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 863, § 11, effective May 21.

L. 2002:

(2) and (2.5) amended and (4) added, p. 196, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-11-109 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-9-113. Civil penalties.

In any civil action for the enforcement of this article, the court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party, and a customer shall be entitled to treble damages for failure of any motor vehicle repair facility or any employee of such facility to comply with this article, except for clerical errors or omissions; but in no event shall such damages be less than two hundred fifty dollars. The customer shall first make written demand for the customer's damages from the motor vehicle repair facility by certified mail at least ten days prior to the filing of any such action, exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, and any legal holiday. Such action shall be brought within the time period prescribed in section 13-80-103, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 864, § 12, effective May 21.